Connecticut, session 2026, HB05582.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 4 of public act 18-154 is amended to read as follows
(Effective from passage):
(a) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Commissioner of Administrative Services shall, on behalf of the
Commissioner of Developmental Services, convey to the town of
Stratford a parcel of land located in the town of Stratford, at a cost equal
to the administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said parcel of
land is identified as a portion of Lot 4 in Block 11 on town of Stratford's
Assessor's Map 30-16 and is located at 300 Armory Road. The
Department of Developmental Services shall retain a portion of the
parcel for administrative offices and parking, until conveyed pursuant
to subdivision (2) of this subsection. The Commissioner of
Administrative Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of
Developmental Services, shall identify the metes and bounds of said
parcel, including any necessary easements, after a survey of said parcel
has been completed and paid for by the town of Stratford. The
Department of Developmental Services, Department of Administrative
Services and the town of Stratford shall enter into a written agreement
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5582
concerning the continuing operation and maintenance of the conveyed
parcel and the portion retained by the Department of Developmental
Services until a conveyance is made pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
subsection. The Commissioner of Administrative Services shall not
convey said parcel prior to the execution of such agreement. The
conveyance shall be subject to the approval of the State Properties
Review Board.
(2) The Commissioner of Administrative Services shall, on behalf of
the Commissioner of Developmental Services, convey to the town of
Stratford the portion of the parcel that was retained by the state under
subdivision (1) of this subsection prior to the effective date of this section
and any improvements on said parcel, at a cost equal to the
administrative costs of making such conveyance. Such conveyance shall
be subject to the Department of Developmental Services entering into a
written agreement with the town of Stratford for the department to
continue to access and use said portion and improvements for
administrative offices and parking at no cost. Once said portion is
conveyed under this section, the reconstituted parcel shall include both
"Proposed Lot to be Retained by State of Connecticut 48,741 S.F. ± 1.12
Acres ±" and "Proposed Lot to be Conveyed to the Town of Stratford
752,724 S.F. ± 17.280 Acres ±" on a map entitled "Proposed Lot Split of
Parcel MBL 30/16 11/4 Land of the State of Connecticut #300 Armory
Road Stratford, Connecticut Scale: 1"=40', Date: 2024-11-22, certified
substantially correct by Martin Surveying Associates". Said map is on
file in the office of the Town Clerk of Stratford as Map No. 4131.
(b) [The] Other than the portion of the parcel and improvements to
be continued to be used by the Department of Developmental Services
for administrative offices and parking, the town of Stratford shall use
said reconstituted parcel of land for municipal and affordable housing
purposes. If the town of Stratford:
(1) Does not use said parcel for any of said purposes;
(2) Does not retain ownership of all of said parcel; [, other than the
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5582
portion retained by the Department of Developmental Services;] or
(3) Leases all or any portion of said parcel, other than a lease to a
nonprofit organization or public housing authority for affordable
housing purposes, [or] any agreement for short-term use of the parcel
for recreational purposes by the public or the written agreement entered
into with the Department of Developmental Services under subdivision
(2) of subsection (a) of this section, the parcel and improvements shall
revert to the state of Connecticut.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said reconstituted parcel of land and improvements not
later than thirty days after it receives a proposed agreement from the
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to subdivision (2) of
subsection (a) of this section. The land and improvements shall remain
under the care and control of the Department of Developmental Services
until a conveyance is made in accordance with the provisions of this
section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or
instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section, which deed
or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of this
section. The Commissioner of Administrative Services shall have the
sole responsibility for all other incidents of such conveyance.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage PA 18-154, Sec. 4
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsecs. (a)(2) and (b)(3), references to "improvements" were added
for consistency.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3